apertium-sat.sat.dix
<pardef n="ᱫᱚ__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l></l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l></l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l></l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="east__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->      

    <pardef n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- SECTION:  Sub-ordinating Conjunctions -->      
    <pardef n="ᱡᱮ__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   	
	<!-- SECTION:  Adverbial Conjunctions -->      
	<pardef n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  

<pardef n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


	<pardef n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj">
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
   
   
     <pardef n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  
	
	<pardef n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
<!-- Number Noun Paradigms -->    
<pardef n="ᱢᱤᱫ__num_noun">
    <e>
        <p>
            <l>ᱴᱟᱹᱝ</l>
            <r><s n="num_noun"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

	<!-- Paradigms define ends here. -->
	
	
	
	
	
<pardef n="/he__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>he</l>        <r>he<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>he</l>        <r>he<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>him</l>       <r>he<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/she__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>she</l>       <r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>she</l>       <r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>her</l>       <r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

<pardef n="ᱩᱱᱤ__prn">
  <e>
    <p>
      <l></l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

  <e r="RL">
    <p>
      <l></l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

  <e r="RL">
    <p>
      <l></l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱚᱠᱚᱭᱟᱜ__prn">
  <e>
    <p>
      <l>ᱟᱜ</l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

  <e r="RL">
    <p>
      <l>ᱟᱜ</l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

  <e r="RL">
    <p>
      <l>ᱟᱜ</l>
      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ__ᱜᱩᱹᱯᱟᱹ">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="__ᱛᱚᱱᱚᱲᱹᱯᱟᱹᱨᱤᱥ">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ᱚᱠᱟ__ᱛᱚᱱᱚᱲᱹᱯᱟᱹᱨᱤᱥ">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱛᱮ</l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱥᱮᱫ</l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱪᱚ</l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱪᱚ</l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱪᱚ</l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱞᱮᱠᱟ</l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>ᱨᱮ</l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    </pardefs>

<e lm="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ"><i>ᱚᱛᱚᱝ</i><par n="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ__ᱜᱩᱹᱯᱟᱹ"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱚᱴ ᱥᱚᱠᱚᱴ"><i>ᱚᱠᱚᱴ<b/>ᱥᱚᱠᱚᱴ</i><par n="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ__ᱜᱩᱹᱯᱟᱹ"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱚᱡ"><i>ᱚᱠᱚᱡ</i><par n="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ__ᱜᱩᱹᱯᱟᱹ"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱚᱰᱟ"><i>ᱚᱠᱚᱰᱟ</i><par n="ᱚᱛᱚᱝ__ᱜᱩᱹᱯᱟᱹ"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱚᱭ"><i>ᱚᱠᱚᱭ</i><par n="ᱚᱠᱚᱭᱟᱜ__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱟ"><i>ᱚᱠᱟ</i><par n="ᱚᱠᱟ__ᱛᱚᱱᱚᱲᱹᱯᱟᱹᱨᱤᱥ"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱵᱟᱝᱠᱷᱟᱱ"><i>ᱟᱨᱵᱟᱝᱠᱷᱟᱱ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨ"><i>ᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶᱛᱮ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱵᱟᱝ"><i>ᱟᱨᱵᱟᱝ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱮᱱᱠᱷᱟᱱ"><i>ᱢᱮᱱᱠᱷᱟᱱ</i><par n="ᱟᱨ__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱮ"><i>ᱡᱮ</i><par n="ᱡᱮ__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱱᱟᱹ ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ"><i>ᱤᱱᱟᱹ<b/>ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱩᱫᱤ"><i>ᱡᱩᱫᱤ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱱᱟ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱚᱱᱟ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱟᱦᱟᱸ ᱫᱷᱟᱹᱵᱤᱡ"><i>ᱡᱟᱦᱟᱸ<b/>ᱫᱷᱟᱹᱵᱤᱡ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜ ᱥᱮ"><i>ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜ<b/>ᱥᱮ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱟᱸᱦᱟᱸᱶ"><i>ᱪᱟᱸᱦᱟᱸᱶ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜ ᱥᱮ"><i>ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜ<b/>ᱥᱮ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱱᱟᱛᱮ"><i>ᱚᱱᱟᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱮᱢᱚᱱ"><i>ᱡᱮᱢᱚᱱ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱫᱟᱹᱭᱠᱟᱹ ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟᱛᱮ"><i>ᱫᱟᱹᱭᱠᱟᱹ<b/>ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱭ . ᱤ ."><i>ᱟᱭ<b/>.<b/>ᱤ<b/>.</i><par n="ᱪᱮᱫᱟᱜᱥᱮ__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮ"><i>ᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱦᱤᱥᱟᱹᱵ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱦᱤᱥᱟᱹᱵ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱩᱨ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱥᱩᱨ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱩᱨ"><i>ᱥᱩᱨ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱩᱨ ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱥᱩᱨ<b/>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱥᱩᱨᱠᱚᱨᱮ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱥᱩᱨᱠᱚᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱮᱛᱟᱱ ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱪᱮᱛᱟᱱ<b/>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱟᱹᱜᱤᱫ"><i>ᱞᱟᱹᱜᱤᱫ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱠᱷᱟᱹᱛᱤᱨ"><i>ᱠᱷᱟᱹᱛᱤᱨ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱮᱛᱟᱱ"><i>ᱪᱮᱛᱟᱱ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱠᱷᱚᱱ"><i>ᱠᱷᱚᱱ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱮᱫ"><i>ᱥᱮᱫ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱵᱟᱵᱚᱛ ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱵᱟᱵᱚᱛ<b/>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱟᱹᱜᱤᱫ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱞᱟᱹᱜᱤᱫ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱥᱤᱫᱷᱟᱹ ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱥᱤᱫᱷᱟᱹ<b/>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱱᱟᱹ ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ"><i>ᱤᱱᱟᱹ<b/>ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱵᱤᱨᱩᱫᱷ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱵᱤᱨᱩᱫᱷ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱠᱷᱤᱞᱟᱹᱯᱷ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱠᱷᱤᱞᱟᱹᱯᱷ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱷᱤᱛᱨᱭ ᱨᱮ"><i>ᱵᱷᱤᱛᱨᱭ<b/>ᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱟᱛᱟᱨ"><i>ᱞᱟᱛᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶᱼᱥᱟᱶ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶᱼᱥᱟᱶ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱶᱛᱮ"><i>ᱥᱟᱶᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱞᱟᱛᱟᱨ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱞᱟᱛᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱜ ᱥᱩᱨ"><i>ᱟᱜ<b/>ᱥᱩᱨ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱦᱤᱥᱟᱹᱵ ᱛᱮ"><i>ᱦᱤᱥᱟᱹᱵ<b/>ᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱛᱚ ᱡᱷᱚᱜ"><i>ᱚᱠᱛᱚ<b/>ᱡᱷᱚᱜ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱩᱱ ᱡᱷᱚᱜ"><i>ᱩᱱ<b/>ᱡᱷᱚᱜ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱠᱟᱨᱚᱬ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱠᱟᱨᱚᱬ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ ᱠᱟᱨᱚᱬ"><i>ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ<b/>ᱠᱟᱨᱚᱬ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ"><i>ᱛᱟᱭᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱨᱮᱭᱟᱜ__post"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱧᱟᱜ"><i>ᱤᱧᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱤᱫᱴᱟᱹᱝ"><i>ᱢᱤᱫᱴᱟᱹᱝ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟ"><i>ᱞᱮᱠᱷᱟ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱴᱟᱜ"><i>ᱮᱴᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ"><i>ᱟᱭᱢᱟ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱰᱷᱮᱨ"><i>ᱰᱷᱮᱨ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱟᱨᱭᱟ"><i>ᱵᱟᱨᱭᱟ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱟᱨ"><i>ᱵᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱟᱭᱢᱟ__det"/></e>
<e lm="ᱩᱱᱤ"><i>ᱩᱱᱤ</i><par n="ᱩᱱᱤ__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱤᱫ">             <i>ᱢᱤᱫ</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱫ__num_noun"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱛᱦᱚᱵ"><i>ᱮᱛᱦᱚᱵ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱫᱚᱥᱟᱨ"><i>ᱫᱚᱥᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱮᱥᱟᱨ"><i>ᱛᱮᱥᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱯᱩᱱᱟᱹᱜ"><i>ᱯᱩᱱᱟᱹᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱭᱮᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱮᱭᱮᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱮᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱟᱨᱮᱭᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱜᱮᱞᱟᱱᱟᱜ"><i>ᱜᱮᱞᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ</i><par n="ᱯᱩᱭᱞᱩ/ᱭᱟᱱᱟᱜ__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱚᱢ"><i>ᱡᱚᱢ</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱫᱚ"><i>ᱫᱚ</i><par n="ᱫᱚ__vblex"/></e>
